Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1418
Genetic testing; costs.

In cases where the court orders genetic testing at the request of a party, the requesting party shall initially pay such expense. In cases where the court orders genetic testing in the absence of a request of any party, the assessment of the cost of such testing shall be determined by the court. Whenever the disputing party prevails, the costs shall be borne by the other party.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 5.

It is within the discretion of the trial judge in a paternity action to determine costs if the disputing party loses. Henke v. Guerrero, 13 Neb. App. 337, 692 N.W.2d 762 (2005).